src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1nnguaq_possessumZ 
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  PL20220201 LEX til sekvensen UTE=NNGUAQ + POSSESSUM
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>g2a Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCa	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCni	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrput	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrsi	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCat Krestr ;!Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtik	Krestr ;!Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCma	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCvit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCata	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmi	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtta	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssi	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCata	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCmik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCanut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCannut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnut	TrmVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCanit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCannit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnit	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCani	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmini	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCanni	LokVb ;!Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminni	LokVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCttut	AeqVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCttut	AeqVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCatut	AeqVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmisut	AeqVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsitut	AeqVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssitut	AeqVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCattut	AeqVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCmittut	AeqVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCanik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCannik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnik	Krestr ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCagut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCmikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1nnguaq_ateqZ

LEXICON Zateq_oqsZ
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
    Zateq_oqsZ-suf ;      !SUB    
