src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
CBC% North Zateq_oqsZ ;
Moujahid Zateq_oqsZ ;
Nationalt% Center% for% Miljø% og% Energi+Sem/inst:Nationalt% Center% for% Miljø% og% Energi Zateq_oqsZ ;
Tusagassiuinermi% Sulisut% Peqatigiiffiat% (TP) Zateq_oqsZ ;
Wistoft Zateq_oqsZ ;
Witoft Zateq_oqsZ ;
